Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-317
Juvenile emergency shelter care; contracts authorized.

Any municipal corporation may contract with any person and provide funds for juvenile emergency shelter care. For purposes of this section:

(1) Juvenile emergency shelter care shall mean temporary twenty-four-hour physical care and supervision in crisis situations and at times when an appropriate foster care resource is not available to persons eighteen years of age or younger; and

(2) Municipal corporation shall be as defined in section 13-309.

Laws 1993, LB 526, § 1.